dictionaries/hr_HR/hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
SFX VL Y      108
SFX VL bac    pca        bac
SFX VL bac    pce        bac
SFX VL bac    pci        bac
SFX VL bac    pcu        bac
SFX VL bac    pče        bac
SFX VL bac    pcem       bac
SFX VL bac    baca       bac
SFX VL bac    pcima      bac
SFX VL bel    bla        bel
SFX VL bel    blu        bel
SFX VL bel    ble        bel
SFX VL bel    blom       bel
SFX VL bel    blovi      bel
SFX VL bel    blova      bel
SFX VL bel    blovima    bel
SFX VL bel    blove      bel
SFX VL dac    ca         dac
SFX VL dac    cu         dac
SFX VL dac    če         dac
SFX VL dac    cem        [^e]dac
SFX VL dac    com        [e]dac
SFX VL dac    ci         dac
SFX VL dac    daca       dac
SFX VL dac    cima       dac
SFX VL dac    ce         dac
SFX VL dak    tka        dak
SFX VL dak    tku        dak
SFX VL dak    dče        dak
SFX VL dak    če         dak
SFX VL dak    tke        dak
SFX VL dak    tkom       dak
SFX VL dak    ci         dak
SFX VL dak    dci        dak
SFX VL dak    daka       dak
SFX VL dak    cima       dak
SFX VL dak    dcima      dak
SFX VL tac    ca         tac
SFX VL tac    cu         tac
SFX VL tac    če         tac
SFX VL tac    cem        tac
SFX VL tac    ci         tac
SFX VL tac    taca       tac
SFX VL tac    cima       tac
SFX VL tac    ce         tac
SFX VL tak    tka        tak
SFX VL tak    tku        tak
SFX VL tak    tče        tak
SFX VL tak    tkom       tak
SFX VL tak    tci        tak
SFX VL tak    taka       tak
SFX VL tak    tcima      tak
SFX VL tak    tke        tak
SFX VL tak    če         tak
SFX VL tak    ci         tak
SFX VL tak    cima       tak
SFX VL lac    oca        lac
SFX VL lac    ocu        lac
SFX VL lac    oče        lac
SFX VL lac    ocem       lac
SFX VL lac    oci        lac
SFX VL lac    laca       lac
SFX VL lac    ocima      lac
SFX VL lac    oce        lac
SFX VL ak     ka         [čšsj]ak
SFX VL ak     ku         [čšsj]ak
SFX VL ak     kom        [čšsj]ak
SFX VL ak     kovi       [čšsj]ak
SFX VL ak     kova       [čšsj]ak
SFX VL ak     kovima     [čšsj]ak
SFX VL ak     kove       [čšsj]ak
SFX VL sac    sca        sac
SFX VL sac    sce        sac
SFX VL sac    sci        sac
SFX VL sac    scu        sac
SFX VL sac    šče        sac
SFX VL sac    scem       sac
SFX VL sac    saca       sac
SFX VL sac    scima      sac
SFX VL zac    sca        zac
SFX VL zac    sce        zac
SFX VL zac    sci        zac
SFX VL zac    scu        zac
SFX VL zac    šče        zac
SFX VL zac    scem       zac
SFX VL zac    zaca       zac
SFX VL zac    scima      zac
SFX VL zak    ska        zak
SFX VL zak    sku        zak
SFX VL zak    skom       zak
SFX VL zak    sci        zak
SFX VL zak    zaka       zak
SFX VL zak    scima      zak
SFX VL zak    ske        zak
SFX VL žak    ška        žak
SFX VL žak    šku        žak
SFX VL žak    ške        žak
SFX VL žak    škom       žak
SFX VL žak    šci        žak
SFX VL žak    žaka       žak
SFX VL žak    šcima      žak
SFX VL žac    šca        žac
SFX VL žac    šcu        žac
SFX VL žac    šče        žac
SFX VL žac    šce        žac
SFX VL žac    šcem       žac
SFX VL žac    šci        žac
SFX VL žac    žaca       žac
SFX VL žac    šcima      žac

SFX VK Y      7
SFX VK 0      a          .
SFX VK 0      u          .
SFX VK 0      om         [^čćšj]
SFX VK 0      em         [čćšj]
SFX VK k      če         k
SFX VK g      že         g
SFX VK h      še         h

SFX VJ Y      40
SFX VJ ec     ca         ec
SFX VJ ec     cu         ec
SFX VJ ec     če         ec
SFX VJ ec     cem        ec
SFX VJ ac     ca         ac
SFX VJ ac     cu         ac
SFX VJ ac     če         ac
SFX VJ ac     cem        ac
SFX VJ al     la         al
SFX VJ al     lu         al
SFX VJ al     le         al
SFX VJ al     lom        al
SFX VJ ar     ra         ar
SFX VJ ar     ru         ar
SFX VJ ar     re         ar
SFX VJ ar     rom        ar
SFX VJ at     ta         at
SFX VJ at     tu         at
SFX VJ at     te         at
SFX VJ at     tom        at
SFX VJ k      ka         sk
SFX VJ k      ku         sk
SFX VJ k      šče        sk
SFX VJ k      kom        sk
SFX VJ k      ci         sk
SFX VJ k      aka        sk
SFX VJ k      cima       sk
SFX VJ k      ke         sk
SFX VJ tak    ka         stak
SFX VJ tak    ku         stak
SFX VJ stak   šče        stak
SFX VJ tak    kom        stak
SFX VJ tak    ci         stak
SFX VJ tak    taka       stak
SFX VJ tak    cima       stak
SFX VJ tak    ke         stak
SFX VJ sak    ska        sak
SFX VJ sak    sku        sak
SFX VJ sak    šče        sak
SFX VJ sak    skom       sak

SFX VI Y      11
SFX VI 0      a          .
SFX VI 0      u          .
SFX VI 0      om         .
SFX VI 0      ovi        .
SFX VI 0      ova        .
SFX VI 0      ovima      .
SFX VI 0      ove        .
SFX VI 0      e          [^kgh]
SFX VI k      če         k
SFX VI g      že         g
SFX VI h      še         h

SFX VH Y      9
SFX VH 0      a          .
SFX VH 0      u          .
SFX VH 0      em         e
SFX VH 0      em         ic
SFX VH 0      om         c
SFX VH c      čevi       c
SFX VH c      čeva       c
SFX VH c      čevima     c
SFX VH c      čeve       c

SFX VG Y      7
SFX VG 0      a          .
SFX VG 0      u          .
SFX VG 0      em         .
SFX VG 0      evi        .
SFX VG 0      eva        .
SFX VG 0      evima      .
SFX VG 0      eve        .

SFX VF Y      36
SFX VF 0      a          . 
SFX VF 0      u          .
SFX VF 0      e          .
SFX VF 0      om         .
SFX VF ijep   epovi      ijep
SFX VF ijep   epova      ijep
SFX VF ijep   epovima    ijep
SFX VF ijep   epove      ijep
SFX VF ijep   jepovi     ijep
SFX VF ijep   jepova     ijep
SFX VF ijep   jepovima   ijep
SFX VF ijep   jepove     ijep
SFX VF ijeg   egovi      ijeg
SFX VF ijeg   egova      ijeg
SFX VF ijeg   egovima    ijeg
SFX VF ijeg   egove      ijeg
SFX VF ijeg   jegovi     ijeg
SFX VF ijeg   jegova     ijeg
SFX VF ijeg   jegovima   ijeg
SFX VF ijeg   jegove     ijeg
SFX VF ijet   jetovi     ijet
SFX VF ijet   jetova     ijet
SFX VF ijet   jetovima   ijet
SFX VF ijet   jetove     ijet
SFX VF ijek   jekovi     ijek
SFX VF ijek   jekova     ijek
SFX VF ijek   jekovima   ijek
SFX VF ijek   jekove     ijek
SFX VF ijem   emovi      ijem
SFX VF ijem   emova      ijem
SFX VF ijem   emovima    ijem
SFX VF ijem   emove      ijem
SFX VF ijem   jemovi     ijem
SFX VF ijem   jemova     ijem
SFX VF ijem   jemovima   ijem
SFX VF ijem   jemove     ijem

SFX VE Y      15
SFX VE 0      ja         i
SFX VE 0      ju         i
SFX VE 0      jem        i
SFX VE e      a          e
SFX VE e      u          e
SFX VE e      em         e
SFX VE o      a          o
SFX VE o      u          o
SFX VE o      om         o
SFX VE 0      a          k
SFX VE 0      u          k
SFX VE 0      om         k
SFX VE ec     ca         ec
SFX VE ec     cu         ec
SFX VE ec     cem        ec

SFX VD Y      32
SFX VD 0      ja         i
SFX VD 0      ju         i
SFX VD 0      jem        i
SFX VD 0      ji         i
SFX VD 0      je         i
SFX VD 0      jima       i
SFX VD 0      ta         e
SFX VD 0      tu         e
SFX VD 0      tom        e
SFX VD e      ad         e
SFX VD e      adi        e
SFX VD ao     la         ao
SFX VD ao     lu         ao
SFX VD ao     le         ao
SFX VD ao     lom        ao
SFX VD ao     li         ao
SFX VD ao     ala        ao
SFX VD ao     lima       ao
SFX VD eo     ela        eo
SFX VD eo     elu        eo
SFX VD eo     ele        eo
SFX VD eo     elom       eo
SFX VD eo     eli        eo
SFX VD eo     elima      eo
SFX VD gac    kca        gac
SFX VD gac    kcu        gac
SFX VD gac    kče        gac
SFX VD gac    kcem       gac
SFX VD gac    kci        gac
SFX VD gac    gaca       gac
SFX VD gac    kcima      gac
SFX VD gac    kce        gac

AF VOVI	# 208
AF VOVIUJ	# 209
AF VMVL	# 248
AF VL	# 260
AF VLUF	# 262
AF VLUFUA	# 263
AF VK	# 265
AF VKUJ	# 266
AF VKUJUA	# 268
AF VJ	# 271
AF VJUJ	# 272
AF VI	# 273
AF VIUJ	# 280
AF VIUA	# 283
AF VITL	# 285
AF VH	# 286
AF VG	# 287
AF VGUJ	# 288
AF VGUA	# 290
AF VF	# 291
AF VFUJ	# 293
AF VE	# 298
AF VEUF	# 303
AF VD	# 304
AF VDUS	# 307
